District of Columbia statutes.
1-321.01

Mayor’s authority to determine honorariums; deposit of funds in Treasury; receipt of honorarium without prejudice to retirement compensation; “honorarium” defined.

(a)

Notwithstanding the provisions set forth in the sections mentioned in § 1-321.02, the Mayor of the District of Columbia is authorized and empowered to determine from time to time the honorariums to be paid to the members of the boards, commissions, and committees appointed and established by authority of such sections, such authority to include the power to determine the total amount per annum of any such honorarium.

(b)

The funds derived from fees and charges for examinations, licenses, certificates, registrations, or for any other service rendered by any such board, commission, or committee, remaining after the payment, or provision made for payment of all obligations of the respective boards, commissions, and committees outstanding as of June 30, 1954, shall be deposited in the Treasury to the credit of the District of Columbia and on and after July 14, 1956, all moneys collected for such fees and charges shall be paid into the Treasury to the credit of the District of Columbia.

(c)

Notwithstanding the limitation of any other law or regulation to the contrary, any person heretofore or hereafter appointed as a member of any such board, commission or committee may receive his honorarium as well as any retired pay, retirement compensation, or annuity to which such member may be entitled on account of previous service rendered to the United States or District of Columbia government.

(d)

As used in §§ 1-321.01 to 1-321.06, “honorarium” means the fee, per diem, compensation, or any amount paid to any member of any such board, commission, or committee for service as such member. Payments made under §§ 1-321.01 to 1-321.06 shall be governed by the provisions of § 1-611.08.

July 14, 1956, 70 Stat. 532, ch. 590, § 1
Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3205(oo), 25 DCR 5740

History

Merit system, effective date provisions, see § 1-636.02.

Cross References

This section is referenced in § 1-636.02.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 1-348.
1973 Ed., § 1-254.

Prior Codifications

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.

Change in Government